Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.210

Records kept—Preservation—Inspection of.

Every dealer, handler, and processor shall keep a complete and accurate record of all soft tree fruits handled, shipped, or processed by him or her. Such record shall be in simple form and contain such information as the commission shall by rule or regulation prescribe. The records shall be preserved by such handler, dealer, and processor for a period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written request of the commission or its duly authorized agents.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6041; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.210. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 20; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-29.]